California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(f) “Persistent residues in compost” means residues of an herbicide in compost at levels and in a form with the potential to be toxic or injurious to plants.

(g) “Plants” means desirable vegetation, except weeds.

(h) “Weed” means any plant that grows where not wanted, as defined in Section 12759.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 591, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

13191.

(a) No person, except a pest control dealer licensed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 12101) of Division 6 of the Food and Agricultural Code, may sell a pesticide that contains the active ingredient clopyralid.

(b) Pesticides containing the active ingredient clopyralid that are labeled for use on lawns and turf, including golf courses, may only be sold to qualified applicators licensed pursuant to Chapter 8(commencing with Section 12201) of Division 6 of the Food and Agricultural Code or issued a certificate pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 14151) of Division 7 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 591, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

13192.

Not later than April 1, 2003, the department shall, pursuant to Sections 12824 and 12825, do both of the following:

(a) Determine in writing those lawn and turf uses of the herbicide clopyralid for which there is no reasonable likelihood that the specified use will result in persistent residues in compost.

(b) Take either of the following actions:

(1) Impose appropriate restrictions on the lawn and turf uses of the herbicide clopyralid that are not identified in the determination made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Cancel any lawn and turf use that the department determines is likely to result in persistent residues in compost.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 591, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Restricted Materials [14001. - 14086.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [14001. - 14015.]

14001.

The director shall control and otherwise regulate the use of restricted materials found to meet the criteria of Section 14004.5.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.

This chapter applies to all agencies of the United States and the State of California and its subdivisions or to their officers, agents, or employees. Nothing in this section affects the liability of a public entity under Section 862 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1223.)
-------------------------------------------

14003.

This article does not relieve any person from liability for any damage to the person or property of another person which is caused by the use of any restricted material.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------

14004.

The director, and the commissioner of each county under the direction and supervision of the director, shall enforce this chapter and the regulations issued pursuant to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14004.5.

The director shall, by regulation, designate and establish as necessary to carry out the purposes of this division, a list of restricted materials based upon, but not limited to, any of the following criteria:

(a) Danger of impairment of public health.

(b) Hazards to applicators and farmworkers.

(c) Hazards to domestic animals, including honeybees, or to crops from direct application or drift.

(d) Hazard to the environment from drift onto streams, lakes, and wildlife sanctuaries.

(e) Hazards related to persistent residues in the soil resulting ultimately in contamination of the air, waterways, estuaries or lakes, with consequent damage to fish, wild birds, and other wildlife.

(f) Hazards to subsequent crops through persistent soil residues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 256, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.

Except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 14006.6, the director shall adopt regulations which govern the possession and use of any restricted material which he or she finds and determines is injurious to the environment or to any person, animal, crop, or other property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1266, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.

The regulations shall prescribe the time when, and the conditions under which, a restricted material may be used or possessed in different areas of the state, and may prohibit its use or possession in those areas. This usage shall be limited to those situations in which it is reasonably certain that no injury will result, or no nonrestricted material or procedure is equally effective and practical. They may provide that a restricted material shall be used only under permit of the commissioner or under the direct supervision of the commissioner, subject to any of the following limitations:

(a) In certain areas.

(b) Under certain conditions relating to safety.

(c) When used in excess of certain quantities or concentrations.

(d) When used in certain mixtures.

(e) In compliance with the industrial safety orders of the Department of Industrial Relations and any order of the director or commissioner.

(f) On agreement by the owner or person in possession of the property to be treated to comply with certain conditions.

(g) Any other limitation the director determines to be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

This section shall become operative on January 1, 1991.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1284, Sec. 8.   Section operative January 1, 1991, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.5.

(a) Except as provided in Section 14006.6, a person shall not use or possess a pesticide designated as a restricted material for any agricultural use except under a written permit of the commissioner. A permit shall not be issued for any restricted material for use in any manner other than pursuant to its registration without the approval of the director. In addition, a permit shall not be granted if the commissioner determines that paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12825 would be applicable to the proposed use.

(b) Before issuing a permit for a pesticide, the commissioner shall consider local conditions, including, but not
 limited to, all of the following:

(1) Use in vicinity of schools, dwellings, hospitals, recreational areas, and livestock enclosures.

(2) Problems related to heterogeneous planting of crops.

(3) Applications of materials known to create severe resurgence or secondary pest problems without compensating control of pest species.

(4) Meteorological conditions for use.

(5) Timing of applications in relation to bee activity.

(6) Provisions for proper storage of pesticides and disposal of containers.

(c) Each permit issued for any pesticide shall include conditions for use in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 24.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.6.

(a) A permit shall not be required for the agricultural use of any pesticide not designated as a restricted material unless the commissioner determines that its use will present an undue hazard when used under local conditions.

(b) Permits for the use of pesticides shall not be required of persons found to be qualified by the director who are engaged in experimentation or research on the use of pesticides, where no charge is made to the person in charge of the property treated.

(c) A permit shall not be required for the possession of pesticides by a registrant, as defined in Section 12755, or by a licensed pest control dealer when operating pursuant to the registration or the license; by commercial warehouses storing pesticides; or for the possession and use of these materials when specifically exempted by regulation of the director in cases in which the mitigation measures provided by the permit system are not necessary to avoid injury to the environment or to any person, animal, crop, or property.

(d) Permits for the use of pesticides shall not be required of persons operating pursuant to a license issued under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 8500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.7.

The director shall designate, by regulation, a list of “exempt materials” for which the director finds additional restrictions, other than registration and labeling requirements, are not necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The exempt materials may be used without a permit if the use conforms with the registered label or printed instructions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 256, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.

(a) Every permit that is issued under the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter is conditioned upon compliance with this code and regulations adopted pursuant thereto and upon other specified conditions that may be required to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Any permit may be issued for a one-year period. Permits issued for perennial agricultural plantings, nonproduction agricultural sites, or nonagricultural sites may be issued for up to a three-year period.

(c) The permittee or a designated agent shall report immediately any change in the information submitted or pertinent to the issuance of a valid permit to the appropriate commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 435, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14008.

Any permit may be refused, revoked, or suspended for violation of any of the conditions of the permit, or of a previous permit, or for violation of any provision of this division or of the regulations that are issued pursuant to it, or for the failure to pay a civil penalty or comply with any lawful order of the commissioner, once that order is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 806, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14009.

(a) (1) An interested person may request the commissioner to review their action in issuing, refusing, revoking, suspending, or conditioning a permit to use or possess a restricted material. The request for review of the commissioner’s action shall be limited to the issues described in subdivision (d). The commissioner shall review the request and issue a written decision in response to the request to review within 10 days of receipt of the request.
 If the commissioner is unable to complete the review within 10 days, the commissioner shall notify the person requesting a review in writing, including an estimated timeline for completion. The commissioner may affirm, modify, or cancel the permit action reviewed. An interested person may thereafter appeal to the director to review the commissioner’s action within 30 days of the date of receiving the commissioner’s written decision.

(2) No later than January 31 of each year, the commissioner shall report to the director the number and share of total reviews within their jurisdiction in the
 previous calendar year that were not completed within the 10-day timeline provided in this subdivision, the average number of days required for review, and the number of permits that were affirmed, modified, or cancelled.

(b) The commissioner and director shall conduct each review in an expeditious manner so that needed pest control measures are not adversely affected.

(c) Each request for review, limited to the issues described in subdivision (d), shall be submitted in writing to the commissioner by the person requesting the review and shall include all of the following:

(1) The location of persons, property, or areas that would be affected and the location of property to be treated.

(2) The name of the restricted material involved.

(3) The name and address of the person in charge of the property to be treated, if different from the person filing the request for review.

(4) Any other information that the person filing the request for review or the commissioner determines to be relevant.

(d) In an appeal of a commissioner’s action to the director, the issues are limited to any of the following:

(1) Whether the proposed permit use is consistent with applicable pesticide label restrictions and applicable regulations.

(2) Whether the commissioner properly considered Section 14006.5.

(3) Whether the commissioner abused their discretion in issuing, refusing, revoking, or conditioning the permit.

(e) The director shall act on these appeals within 10 days of receipt thereof. If the director is unable to complete the review within 10 days, the director shall notify the appellant, in writing, including an estimated timeline for completion. The director may stay the operation of a permit until their review is complete.
 As part of its annual reporting requirements pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12824.5, the department shall report the number and share of total cases in which the director did not meet the timeline provided in this subdivision, the average number of days required for review of appeals, and the number of permits that were affirmed, modified, or cancelled.

(f) (1) Before acting on an appeal, the director shall make publicly available all of the information provided to them as specified in this section if requested to do so in writing by any interested person.

(2) At any time before acting on an appeal, the director may request additional testimony or other evidence specified in this section at the public review from interested persons.

(g) Judicial review of any decision by the director pursuant to this section shall be pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Review shall be limited to whether the proposed permit use is consistent with applicable pesticide label restrictions and regulations and whether the director abused their discretion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 25.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14010.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or deliver any restricted material to any person that is required by regulations adopted by the director to have a permit to possess or use the restricted material unless the permittee, or the permittee’s agent to whom delivery is made, provides to the seller or the person delivering the restricted material a copy of a permit which authorizes possession or use of the kind and quantity of the restricted material on the date the restricted material is delivered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 507, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.

It is unlawful for any person to apply any restricted material for which regulations have been adopted except as provided in the regulations which are adopted by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.5.

Except as may be provided in regulations adopted by the director, a pesticide use report shall be submitted to the commissioner, on a form prescribed by the director, within seven days after each use of a restricted material.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 926.   Effective September 18, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

14012.

(a) Any person who is required to register pesticides under Article 4 (commencing with Section 12811) of Chapter 2, and who sells or transfers any restricted material, shall keep accurate records of the amount and type of material involved in every sale or transfer of any restricted material. The records shall be open during ordinary business hours to the inspection of the director.

(b) Each commissioner shall submit to the director a copy of each pesticide use report received pursuant to Section 14011.5, and any other relevant information the director may require. Copies of the reports from the commissioners shall be rendered to the director within one calendar month after they are received.

The contents of these reports shall be summarized quarterly by the director as to the type of material and amounts, and the summaries shall be made a public record. The director may publish or distribute the summaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14015.

Except as provided by regulation adopted by the director, a restricted material shall only be possessed or used by, or under the direct supervision of, a private applicator, who is certified pursuant to Section 14093, or a certified commercial applicator, as defined by Section 6000 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 705, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Pesticides [14021. - 14027.]

14021.

(a) As used in this article, “pesticide” is defined in Section 12753.

(b) For purposes of this article, “toxic air contaminant” means an air pollutant that may cause or contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in serious illness, or which may pose a present or potential hazard to human health. Pesticides that have been identified as hazardous air pollutants pursuant to Section 7412 of Title 42 of the United States Code shall be identified by the director as toxic air contaminants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14022.

(a) In consultation with the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment and the State Air Resources Board, the director shall evaluate the health effects of pesticides that may be or are emitted into the ambient air of California and that may be determined to be a toxic air contaminant that poses a present or potential hazard to human health. Upon request of the State Air Resources Board, the director shall include a pesticide for evaluation.

(b) The director shall complete the evaluation of a pesticide within 90 days after receiving the scientific data specified in subdivision (c) from the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment and the State Air Resources Board.
 The director may extend the 90-day deadline for a period not to exceed 30 days if the director transmits to the Assembly Committee on Rules and the Senate Committee on Rules, for transmittal to the appropriate standing, select, or joint committee of the Legislature, a statement of reasons for extension of the deadline.

(c) In conducting this evaluation, the director shall consider all available scientific data, including, but not limited to, relevant data provided by the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, the Occupational Safety and Health Division of the Department of Industrial Relations, international and federal health agencies, private industry, academic researchers, and public health and environmental organizations. At the request of the director, the State Air Resources Board shall document the level of airborne emissions
 and the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment shall provide an assessment of related health effects of pesticides that may be determined to pose a present or potential hazard and each agency shall provide technical assistance to the department as it conducts its evaluation.

(d) The director may request, and any person shall provide, information on any substance that is or may be under evaluation and that is manufactured, distributed, or used by the person to whom the request is made, in order to carry out the director’s responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. Any person providing information pursuant to this subdivision shall identify, at the request of the director, that portion of the information submitted to the department that is a trade secret and, upon the request of the director, shall provide documentation to support the
 claim of the trade secret. Information supplied that is a trade secret, as specified in Section 7924.510 of the Government Code, and that is so marked at the time of submission shall not be released to the public by the director, except in accordance with Section 1060 of the Evidence Code and Section 21160 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) The director shall give priority to the evaluation and regulation of substances based on factors related to the risk of harm to public health, amount or potential amount of emissions, manner of usage of the pesticide in California, persistence in the atmosphere, and ambient concentrations in the community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 122.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

14023.

(a) Upon completion of the evaluation conducted pursuant to Section 14022, the director shall, in consultation and with the participation of the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, prepare a report on the health effects of the pesticide that may be determined to be a toxic air contaminant that poses a present or potential hazard to human health due to airborne emission from its use. The report shall assess the availability and quality of data on health effects, including potency, mode of action, and other relevant biological factors, of the substance. The report shall also contain an estimate of the levels of exposure that may cause or contribute to adverse health effects and, in the case where there is no threshold of significant
 adverse health effects, the range of risk to humans, resulting from current or anticipated exposure. The report shall include the findings of the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment. The report shall be made available to the public, subject to subdivision (d) of Section 14022.

(b) The report prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be formally reviewed by the scientific review panel established according to Section 39670 of the Health and Safety Code. The director shall also make available the data deemed necessary to the scientific review panel, according to departmental procedures established to ensure confidentiality of proprietary information. The panel shall review, as appropriate, the scientific data on which the report is based, the scientific procedures and methods used to support the data, and the conclusions and assessments on which the report is based. The panel shall submit its written findings to the director within
 45 days after receiving the report, but it may petition the director for an extension of the deadline, which may not exceed 15 working days.

(c) If the scientific review panel determines that the health effects report is seriously deficient, the report shall be returned to the director who shall revise and resubmit the report, within 30 days following receipt of the panel’s determination, to the panel before development of emission control measures.

(d) Within 10 working days following receipt of the findings of the scientific review panel pursuant to subdivision (b), the director shall prepare a hearing notice and a proposed regulation that shall include the proposed determination as to whether a pesticide is a toxic air contaminant. After conducting a public hearing pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code,
 the director shall list, by regulation, pesticides determined to be toxic air contaminants.

(e) The director shall determine, in consultation with the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, the State Air Resources Board, and the air pollution control districts or air quality management districts in the affected counties, the need for and appropriate degree of control measures for each pesticide listed as a toxic air contaminant pursuant to subdivision (d). Any person may submit written information for consideration by the director in making determinations on control measures. The director’s written determination and any formal written comments made by the consulting agencies shall be made available to the public.

(f) For each pesticide identified by the director as a toxic air contaminant based on its listing as a hazardous air pollutant pursuant to Section 7412 of
 Title 42 of the United States Code for which a risk assessment has been completed, the director, in consultation with the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, the State Air Resources Board, and the air pollution control or air quality management districts in the affected counties, shall determine the need for and appropriate degree of control measures. Any person may submit written information for consideration by the director in making determinations on control measures. The director’s written determination and any formal written comments made by the consulting agencies shall be made available to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 584, Sec. 2.   (AB 304)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14024.

(a) For those pesticides for which a need for control measures has been determined pursuant to subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 14023 and pursuant to provisions of this code, the director, in consultation with the agricultural commissioners, air pollution control districts, and air quality management districts in the affected counties, shall develop control measures designed to reduce emissions sufficiently so that the source will not expose the public to the levels of exposure that may cause or contribute to significant adverse health effects. If no demonstrable safe level or threshold of significant adverse health effects has been established by the director, the control measures shall be designed to adequately prevent an endangerment of public
 health through the application of best practicable control techniques.

(b) Best practicable control techniques may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Label amendments.

(2) Applicator training.

(3) Restrictions on use patterns or locations.

(4) Changes in application procedures.

(5) Reclassification as a restricted material.

(6) Cancellation.

(c) (1) The director shall follow the consultation procedures set forth in subdivision (a) and, within two years of the
 determination of the need for control measures pursuant to subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 14023, shall adopt control measures to protect human health.

(2) (A) If the director is unable to adopt control measures to protect human health within two years of the determination of the need for control measures pursuant to paragraph (1), the director shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature setting forth the reasons this requirement has not been met.

(B) The director shall update the report submitted to the appropriate committees of the Legislature pursuant to subparagraph (A) every two years until the control measures have been adopted.

(C) If the registration for the use of a particular pesticide is rescinded or if the director determines there has been a dramatic
 decline in the use of a particular pesticide so that control measures for that particular pesticide are no longer needed, the director shall include this information in the report submitted to the appropriate committees of the Legislature pursuant to subparagraph (A) and the director’s obligations pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed to have been met.

(d) For purposes of this section, with respect to any pesticide for which a determination of the need for control measures was made before January 1, 2014, the two-year period described in subdivision (c) shall commence on January 1, 2014.

(e) After conducting a public hearing pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the director shall adopt, by regulation, control measures, including application of the best practicable control techniques enumerated in
 subdivision (b) or any other best applicable control technique, for those pesticides for which a need has been determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 584, Sec. 3.   (AB 304)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14025.

Any person may petition the department to review a determination made pursuant to this article. The petition shall specify the additional scientific evidence regarding the health effects of a pesticide which was not available at the time the original determination was made and any other evidence which would justify a revised determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1047, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14026.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit or expand the department’s authority regarding pesticides which are not determined to be toxic air contaminants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1047, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14027.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12998, any person who violates any rule or regulation, emission limitation, or permit condition adopted pursuant to this article is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each day in which the violation occurs. In assessing a civil penalty under this article, the court shall consider the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the following factors:

(1) The size of the business of the person being charged.

(2) The gravity of the violation.

(3) The good faith of the person being charged.

(4) The history of previous violations.

Any money recovered under this section shall be paid into the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund for use by the department in administering this division and Division 6 (commencing with Section 11401).

(b) Liability may be imposed under subdivision (a) only if the department establishes that the violation was caused by an act which was the result of intentional or negligent conduct by the person accused of the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1380, Sec. 4.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. 2,4-D and Other Herbicides [14031. - 14034.]

14031.

As used in this article, “2,4-D” means any form of 2,4-dichlorophenoxyacetic acid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14032.

Except as otherwise provided in this article and in the regulations which are adopted by the director, it is unlawful for any person to use any form of 2,4-D or any other herbicide which the director finds and determines, after hearing, is injurious to any crop.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14033.

The director shall adopt regulations that govern the use of 2,4-D and any other herbicide which he finds and determines is injurious to any crop that is being grown in any area of the state. The regulations of the director may prescribe the time when, and the conditions under which, a restricted herbicide may be used in different areas of the state. They may provide that a restricted herbicide shall be used only under permit of the commissioner or under the direct supervision of the commissioner, subject to any of the following limitations:

(a) In certain areas.

(b) In excess of certain quantities or concentrations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 806, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14034.

This article does not relieve any person from liability for any damage to the property of another person which is caused by the use of any herbicide which is named in the regulations which are adopted by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Compound 1080 [14061. - 14063.]

14061.

As used in this article, “Compound 1080” means sodium fluoroacetate or any preparation of sodium fluoroacetate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14062.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, it is unlawful for any person to sell, use, or possess any Compound 1080.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

14063.

Subject to regulations of the director, any of the following persons may sell, use, or possess Compound 1080 for the purposes or uses that are specified:

(a) Any federal, state, county, or municipal officer or employee, in his or her official capacity, or any person under the immediate supervision of that officer or employee, may possess Compound 1080 for use for pest control purposes.

(b) Any research or chemical laboratory may possess Compound 1080 for use for the purposes of the laboratory.

(c) Any person duly licensed as a structural pest control operator under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 8500), Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, may possess Compound 1080 for use in his or her business.

(d) Any wholesaler or jobber of any pesticide may sell Compound 1080 to any person included within the above classifications, or for export.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Methyl Bromide and Chloropicrin [14081. - 14082.]

14081.

The director, after investigation and hearing, shall adopt regulations by April 1, 1989, which govern the use of methyl bromide and chloropicrin as field fumigants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 606, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14082.

The director may prescribe the time when, and the conditions under which, methyl bromide and chloropicrin may be used in different areas of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 606, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Paraquat Dichloride [14085. - 14086.]

14085.

For purposes of this chapter, “pesticide” has the same meaning as specified in Section 12753.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 688, Sec. 1.   (AB 1963)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14086.

On or before January 1, 2029, the department shall complete a reevaluation of paraquat dichloride pursuant to Section 12824, and make the determination to retain, cancel, or suspend its registration or to place new appropriate restrictions on the use of pesticide products containing the active ingredient paraquat dichloride.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 688, Sec. 1.   (AB 1963)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.4. Private Applicator Certification [14090. - 14099.5.]

14090.

It is unlawful for a private applicator to possess, use, or supervise the use of a restricted material in accordance with Section 14015 unless that person has a valid private applicator certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 705, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section operative January 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 14099.5.)
-------------------------------------------

14091.

The application for a private applicator certificate or a renewal of the certificate shall be on a form prescribed by the director. Each application shall state the name and address of the applicant and any other information required by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 705, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section operative January 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 14099.5.)
-------------------------------------------

14092.

(a) Applicants shall be examined on the requirements of statutes and regulations concerning pesticide use and pest control operations, including, but not limited to, knowledge of all of the following:

(1) Label directions and restrictions on use.

(2) Calibration.

(3) Pest control equipment.

(4) Pest problems and identification.

(5) Worker protection, including protective clothing and equipment.

(6) Environmentally sensitive areas.

(b) The examination shall be in written form and shall be prepared by the director and administered by the commissioner, or the director in any county where there is no commissioner.

(c) A passing score for the examination is 70 percent or above.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 18.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14093.

The commissioner, or the director in any county where there is no commissioner, shall issue a private applicator certificate to each applicant who passes the examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 705, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section operative January 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 14099.5.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.

If a passing score of 70 percent is not achieved, the applicant may not retake the examination for seven calendar days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 705, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section operative January 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 14099.5.)
-------------------------------------------

14095.

A private applicator certificate shall be issued for a period of three years except that the initial term of a private applicator certificate shall expire as follows:

(a) Certificates issued to private applicators on or after January 1, 1997, with surnames beginning with A to H, inclusive, shall expire on December 31 of each third year following December 31, 1997.

(b) Certificates issued to private applicators on or after January 1, 1997, with surnames beginning with I to Q, inclusive, shall expire on December 31 of each third year following December 31, 1998.

(c) Certificates issued to private applicators on or after January 1, 1997, with surnames beginning with R to Z, inclusive, shall expire on December 31 of each third year following December 31, 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 705, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section operative January 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 14099.5.)
-------------------------------------------

14096.

Certified private applicators may renew their certificate for a period of three years by completing the continuing education requirement as prescribed by the director, by regulation, or by passing an examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 705, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section operative January 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 14099.5.)
-------------------------------------------

14097.

The commissioner, or the director in a county where there is no commissioner, may establish a program to certify employees other than the operator of the property, or other than the operator’s authorized representative. The commissioner’s or the director’s program shall be conducted in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 705, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section operative January 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 14099.5.)
-------------------------------------------

14098.

(a) A private applicator certificate may be refused, revoked, or suspended by the commissioner or director for any of the following reasons:

(1) Failure to comply with any applicable provision of this division or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(2) Failure to supervise the use of a restricted material in a manner that ensures compliance with this division or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(3) Making any false or fraudulent report.
